Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9012

Administration and administrative rules.

(1) The department shall administer, enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter and may adopt rules necessary to carry out its purpose. In adopting such rules, the director shall consider (a) the official definitions of feed ingredients and official feed terms adopted by the association of American feed control officials and published in the official publication of that organization; and (b) any regulation adopted pursuant to the authority of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301, et seq.), if the department would have the authority under this chapter to adopt the regulations. The adoption of rules shall be subject to a public hearing and all other applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act).

(2) The director when adopting rules in respect to the feed industry shall consult with affected parties, such as manufacturers and distributors of commercial feed and any final rule adopted shall be designed to promote orderly marketing and shall be reasonable and necessary and based upon the requirements and condition of the industry and shall be for the purpose of promoting the well-being of the members of the feed industry as well as the well-being of the purchasers and users of feed and for the general welfare of the people of the state.

[ 1995 c 374 s 34; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.